Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Cross references. —

For provision that military shall be subordinate to civil power, see art. 1, § 25, Wyo. Const.

As to credit for military service under Wyoming retirement system, see §

9-3-417

.

As to exemption of members of military forces with reference to driver's licenses, see §

31-7-107

.

For provision that Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act (§§

31-9-101

to

31-9-415

) shall not apply to any motor vehicle owned by United States, Wyoming or political subdivisions or municipalities in Wyoming, see §

31-9-107

.

For authority of public utilities to furnish transportation free or at reduced rates to inmates of national or state homes for disabled volunteer soldiers and of soldiers' and sailors' homes, etc., see §

37-3-105

.

Revision of title. —

Section 1, ch. 138, Laws 1977, revised this title. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1977 Act has been attempted, but where appropriate, historical citations have been added to the revised sections.

Section 2, ch. 138, Laws 1977, reads: “If any other act of the legislature enacted during the same session in which this act is enacted is in conflict with the provisions of this act, the other act shall prevail in all cases to the extent of such conflict, regardless of whether enacted before or after the enactment of this act.”

Section 3, ch. 138, Laws 1977, reads: “This act is effective January 1, 1978.”

Section 1, ch. 128, Laws 1977, added § 19-78.49, which appeared as §

19-2-503

, with subsequent section renumbered.

Section 2, ch. 45, Laws 1977, amended § 19-109(c), which appeared as § 19-5-110(c).

Laws 1998, ch. 99, revised this title. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1998 Act has been attempted but, where appropriate, historical citations have been added to the revised sections.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statements under § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C) [ 42 USC 4332(C)]) in cases involving defense, military and related projects, 75 ALR Fed 119.